Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2863
Temporary educational permit; fee.

The recipient of a temporary educational permit shall pay the required fee.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 463;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 123;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 52;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.30;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 959.